Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6316.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-1 of the General Laws entitled "Public Utilities Commission" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-1-2.2. Long-term contracts for natural gas.
The public utility known as “Rhode Island Energy” shall enter into at least one long-term
contract, for not less than four (4) years, for the procurement of natural gas pipeline capacity with
an interstate pipeline operator.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002550
========